California statutes. Business and Professions Code
It is unlawful for a person who is or has been a partner, officer, director, manager, responsible managing employee, responsible managing member, responsible managing manager, or responsible managing officer of, or an individual who is listed in the personnel of record of, a licensed partnership, corporation, limited liability company, firm, association or other organization to individually engage in the business or individually act in the capacity of a contractor within this state without having a license in good standing to so engage or act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 698, Sec. 3.   (SB 392)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

7028.6.

The Registrar of Contractors is hereby empowered to issue citations containing orders of abatement and civil penalties against persons acting in the capacity of or engaging in the business of a contractor within this state without having a license in good standing to so act or engage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 415, Sec. 17.   (SB 1491)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

7028.7.

(a) If upon inspection or investigation, either upon complaint or otherwise, the registrar has probable cause to believe that a person is acting in the capacity of or engaging in the business of a contractor or salesperson within this state without having a license or registration in good standing to so act or engage, and the person is not otherwise exempted from this chapter, the registrar shall issue a citation to that person.

(b) Within 72 hours of receiving notice that a public entity is intending to award, or has awarded, a contract to an unlicensed contractor, the registrar shall give written notice to the public entity that a citation may be issued if a contract is awarded to an unlicensed
 contractor. If after receiving the written notice from the registrar that the public entity has awarded or awards the contract to an unlicensed contractor, the registrar may issue a citation to the responsible officer or employee of the public entity as specified in Section 7028.15.

(c) Each citation shall be in writing and shall describe with particularity the basis of the citation. Notwithstanding Sections 125.9 and 148, each citation shall contain an order of abatement and an assessment of a civil penalty in an amount not less than fifteen hundred dollars ($1,500) nor more than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000).

(d) With the approval of the Contractors State License Board, the registrar shall prescribe procedures for the issuance of a citation under this section. The board
 shall adopt regulations covering the assessment of a civil penalty that shall give due consideration to the gravity of the violation, and any history of previous violations.

(e) The sanctions authorized under this section shall be separate from, and in addition to, all other remedies either civil or criminal.

(f) The board may adjust the minimum civil penalties imposed by this section for inflation every five years. The adjustment shall be equivalent to the percentage, if any, that the Consumer Price Index, as determined pursuant to Section 2212 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, exceeds the Consumer Price Index at the time this subdivision goes into effect. Any increase determined under this paragraph shall be rounded in multiples of one hundred dollars ($100) for penalties greater than one
 hundred dollars ($100).

(g) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2026.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 233, Sec. 2.   (SB 779)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7028.8.

Service of a citation issued under Section 7028.7 may be made by certified mail at the last known business address or residence address of the person cited.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1124, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

7028.9.

A citation under Section 7028.7 shall be issued by the registrar within four years after the act or omission that is the basis for the citation or within 18 months after the date of the filing of the complaint with the registrar, whichever is later.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 415, Sec. 19.   (SB 1491)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

7028.10.

Any person served with a citation under Section 7028.7 may appeal to the registrar within 15 working days after service of the citation with respect to violations alleged, scope of the order of abatement, or amount of civil penalty assessed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1281, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7028.11.

If within 15 working days after service of the citation, the person cited fails to notify the registrar that he or she intends to appeal the citation, the citation shall be deemed a final order of the registrar and not subject to review by any court or agency. The 15-day period may be extended by the registrar for good cause.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1281, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7028.12.

If the person cited under Section 7028.7 timely notifies the registrar that he or she intends to contest the citation, the registrar shall afford an opportunity for a hearing. The registrar shall thereafter issue a decision, based on findings of fact, affirming, modifying, or vacating the citation or directing other appropriate relief. The proceedings under this section shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the registrar shall have all the powers granted therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1124, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

7028.13.

(a) After the exhaustion of the review procedures provided for in Sections 7028.10 to 7028.12, inclusive, the registrar may apply to the appropriate superior court for a judgment in the amount of the civil penalty and an order compelling the cited person to comply with the order of abatement. The application, which shall include a certified copy of the final order of the registrar, shall constitute a sufficient showing to warrant the issuance of the judgment and order. If the cited person did not appeal the citation, a certified copy of the citation and proof of service, and a certification that the person cited is not or was not a licensed contractor or applicant for a license at the time of issuance of the citation, shall constitute a sufficient showing to warrant the issuance of the judgment and order.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the registrar may delegate the collection of the civil penalty for any citation issued to any person or entity legally authorized to engage in collections. Costs of collection shall be borne by the person cited. The registrar shall not delegate the authority to enforce the order of abatement.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the registrar shall have the authority to assign the rights to the civil penalty, or a portion thereof, for adequate consideration. The assignee and the registrar shall have all the rights afforded under the ordinary laws of assignment of rights and delegation of duties. The registrar shall not assign the order of abatement. The assignee may apply to the appropriate superior court for a judgment based upon the assigned rights upon the same evidentiary showing as set forth in subdivision (a).

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, including subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 340 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the registrar or his or her designee or assignee shall have four years from the date of the final order to collect civil penalties except that the registrar or his or her designee or assignee shall have 10 years from the date of the judgment to enforce civil penalties on citations that have been converted to judgments through the process described in subdivisions (a) and (c).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 280, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

7028.14.

Notwithstanding any other provision of the law, the registrar may waive part of the civil penalty if the person against whom the civil penalty is assessed satisfactorily completes all the requirements for, and is issued, a contractor’s license. Any outstanding injury to the public shall be satisfactorily settled prior to issuance of the license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1174, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7028.15.

(a) It is a misdemeanor for any person to submit a bid to a public agency in order to engage in the business or act in the capacity of a contractor within this state without having a license therefor, except in any of the following cases:

(1) The person is particularly exempted from this chapter. 

(2) The bid is submitted on a state project governed by Section 10164 of the Public Contract Code or on any local agency project governed by Section 20103.5 of the Public Contract Code.

(b) If a person has been previously convicted of the offense described in this section, the court shall impose a fine of 20 percent of the price of the contract under which the unlicensed person performed contracting work, or four thousand five hundred dollars ($4,500), whichever is greater, or imprisonment in the county jail for not less than 10 days nor more than six months, or both.

In the event the person performing the contracting work has agreed to furnish materials and labor on an hourly basis, “the price of the contract” for the purposes of this subdivision means the aggregate sum of the cost of materials and labor furnished and the cost of completing the work to be performed. 

(c) This section shall not apply to a joint venture license, as required by Section 7029.1. However, at the time of making a bid as a joint venture, each person submitting the bid shall be subject to this section with respect to his or her individual licensure. 

(d) This section shall not affect the right or ability of a licensed architect, land surveyor, or registered professional engineer to form joint ventures with licensed contractors to render services within the scope of their respective practices. 

(e) Unless one of the foregoing exceptions applies, a bid submitted to a public agency by a contractor who is not licensed in accordance with this chapter shall be considered nonresponsive and shall be rejected by the public agency. Unless one of the foregoing exceptions applies, a local public agency shall, before awarding a contract or issuing a purchase order, verify that the contractor was properly licensed when the contractor submitted the bid. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, unless one of the foregoing exceptions applies, the registrar may issue a citation to any public officer or employee of a public entity who knowingly awards a contract or issues a purchase order to a contractor who is not licensed pursuant to this chapter. The amount of civil penalties, appeal, and finality of such citations shall be subject to Sections 7028.7 to 7028.13, inclusive. Any contract awarded to, or any purchase order issued to, a contractor who is not licensed pursuant to this chapter is void.

(f) Any compliance or noncompliance with subdivision (e) of this section, as added by Chapter 863 of the Statutes of 1989, shall not invalidate any contract or bid awarded by a public agency during which time that subdivision was in effect. 

(g) A public employee or officer shall not be subject to a citation pursuant to this section if the public employee, officer, or employing agency made an inquiry to the board for the purposes of verifying the license status of any person or contractor and the board failed to respond to the inquiry within three business days. For purposes of this section, a telephone response by the board shall be deemed sufficient.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 294, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

7028.16.

A person who engages in the business or acts in the capacity of a contractor, without having a license therefor, in connection with the offer or performance of repairs or improvements to a residential or nonresidential structure or property, or by adding to, or subtracting from, grounds in connection therewith, for damage or destruction caused by a natural disaster for which a state of emergency is proclaimed by the Governor pursuant to Section 8625 of the Government Code, or for which an emergency or major disaster is declared by the President of the United States, shall be punished by a fine up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 16 months, or for two or three years, or by both
 that fine and imprisonment, or by a fine up to one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment. In addition, a person who utilized the services of the unlicensed contractor is a victim of crime regardless of whether that person had knowledge that the contractor was unlicensed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 364, Sec. 1.   (SB 1189)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

7028.17.

(a) The failure of an unlicensed individual to comply with a citation after it is final is a misdemeanor. 

(b) Notwithstanding Section 1462.5 or 1463 of the Penal Code or any other provision of law, any fine collected upon conviction in a criminal action brought under this section shall be distributed as follows: 

(1) If the action is brought by a district attorney, any fine collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered to be designated for use by the district attorney. 

(2) If the action is brought by a city attorney or city prosecutor, any fine collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the city in which the judgment was entered, to be designated for use by the city attorney.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 7099.85 by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1160, Sec. 30.)
-------------------------------------------

7029.

A joint venture license is a license issued to any combination of individuals, corporations, limited liability companies, partnerships, or other joint ventures, each of which holds a current, active license in good standing. A joint venture license may be issued in any classification in which at least one of the entities is licensed. An active joint venture license shall be automatically suspended by operation of law during any period in which any member of the entity does not hold a current, active license in good standing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 698, Sec. 4.   (SB 392)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

7029.1.

(a) Except as provided in this section, it is unlawful for any two or more licensees, each of whom has been issued a license to act separately in the capacity of a contractor within this state, to be awarded a contract jointly or otherwise act as a contractor without first having secured a joint venture license in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

(b) Prior to obtaining a joint venture license, contractors licensed in accordance with this chapter may jointly bid for the performance of work covered by this section. If a combination of licensees submit a bid for the performance of work for which a joint venture license is required, a failure to obtain that license shall not prevent the imposition of any penalty specified by law for the failure of a contractor who submits a bid to enter into a contract pursuant to the bid.

(c) A violation of this section constitutes a cause for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 607, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7029.5.

Every C-36 plumbing contractor, C-45 sign contractor, and C-57 well-drilling contractor licensed under this chapter shall have displayed on each side of each motor vehicle used in his or her business, for which a commercial vehicle registration fee has been paid pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 9400) of Chapter 6 of Division 3 of the Vehicle Code, his or her name, permanent business address, and contractor’s license number, all in letters and numerals not less than 112 inches high.

The identification requirements of this section shall also apply to any drill rig used for the drilling of water wells.

Failure to comply with this section constitutes a cause for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 432, Sec. 9.   (SB 944)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

7029.6.

Except for contractors identified in Section 7029.5, every contractor licensed under this chapter shall have displayed, in or on each motor vehicle used in his or her construction business, for which a commercial vehicle registration fee has been paid pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 9400) of Chapter 6 of Division 3 of the Vehicle Code, his or her business name and contractors’ license number in a clearly visible location in print type of at least 72-point font or three-quarters of an inch in height and width.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 118, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7030.

(a) Except for contractors writing home improvement contracts pursuant to Section 7151.2 and contractors writing service and repair contracts pursuant to Section 7159.10, every person licensed pursuant to this chapter shall include the following statement in at least 10-point type on all written contracts with respect to which the person is a prime contractor:

 

“Contractors are required by law to be licensed and regulated by the Contractors State License Board which has jurisdiction to investigate complaints against contractors if a complaint regarding a patent act or omission is filed within four years of the date of the alleged
 violation. A complaint regarding a latent act or omission pertaining to structural defects must be filed within 10 years of the date of the alleged violation. Any questions concerning a contractor may be referred to the Registrar, Contractors State License Board, P.O. Box 26000, Sacramento, CA 95826.”

 

(b) Every person licensed pursuant to this chapter shall include the following statement in at least 12-point type in all home improvement contracts written pursuant to Section 7151.2 and service and repair contracts written pursuant to Section 7159.10:

 

“Information about the Contractors State License Board (CSLB): CSLB is the state consumer protection agency that
 licenses and
 regulates construction contractors.

Contact CSLB for information about the licensed contractor you are considering, including information about disclosable complaints, disciplinary actions and civil judgments that are reported to CSLB.

Use only licensed contractors. If you file a complaint against a licensed contractor within the legal deadline (usually four years), CSLB has authority to investigate the complaint. If you use an unlicensed contractor, CSLB may not be able to help you resolve your complaint. Your only remedy may be in civil court, and you may be liable for damages arising out of any injuries to the unlicensed contractor or the unlicensed contractor’s employees.

For more information:

Visit CSLB’s internet
 website at www.cslb.ca.gov

Call CSLB at 800-321-CSLB (2752)

Write CSLB at P.O. Box 26000, Sacramento, CA 95826.”

 

(c) Failure to comply with the notice requirements set forth in subdivision (a) or (b) of this section is cause for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 312, Sec. 55.   (SB 1474)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

7030.1.

(a) A contractor, who has his or her license suspended or revoked two or more times within an eight-year period, shall disclose either in capital letters in 10-point roman boldface type or in contrasting red print in at least 8-point roman boldface type, in a document provided prior to entering into a contract to perform work on residential property with four or fewer units, any disciplinary license suspension, or license revocation during the last eight years resulting from any violation of this chapter by the contractor, whether or not the suspension or revocation was stayed.

(b) The disclosure notice required by this section may be provided in a bid, estimate, or other document prior to entering into a contract.

(c) A violation of this section is subject to the following penalties:

(1) A penalty of one thousand dollars ($1,000) shall be assessed for the first violation.

(2) A penalty of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) shall be assessed for the second violation.

(3) A penalty of five thousand dollars ($5,000) shall be assessed for a third violation in addition to a one-year suspension of license by operation of law.

(4) A fourth violation shall result in the revocation of license in accordance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 282, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

7030.5.

Every person licensed pursuant to this chapter shall include his license number in: (a) all construction contracts; (b) subcontracts and calls for bid; and (c) all forms of advertising, as prescribed by the registrar of contractors, used by such a person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 153.)
-------------------------------------------

7031.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (e), no person engaged in the business or acting in the capacity of a contractor, may bring or maintain any action, or recover in law or equity in any action, in any court of this state for the collection of compensation for the performance of any act or contract where a license is required by this chapter without alleging that they were a duly licensed contractor at all times during the performance of that act or contract regardless of the merits of the cause of action brought by the person, except that this prohibition shall not apply to contractors who are each individually licensed under this chapter but who fail to comply with Section 7029.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (e), a person who utilizes the services of an unlicensed contractor may bring an action in any court of competent jurisdiction in this state to recover all compensation paid to the unlicensed contractor for performance of any act or contract.

(c) A security interest taken to secure any payment for the performance of any act or contract for which a license is required by this chapter is unenforceable if the person performing the act or contract was not a duly licensed contractor at all times during the performance of the act or contract.

(d) If licensure or proper licensure is controverted, then proof of licensure pursuant to this section shall be made by production of a verified certificate of licensure from the Contractors State License
 Board which establishes that the individual or entity bringing the action was duly licensed in the proper classification of contractors at all times during the performance of any act or contract covered by the action. Nothing in this subdivision shall require any person or entity controverting licensure or proper licensure to produce a verified certificate. When licensure or proper licensure is controverted, the burden of proof to establish licensure or proper licensure shall be on the licensee.

(e) The judicial doctrine of substantial compliance shall not apply under this section where the person who engaged in the business or acted in the capacity of a contractor has never been a duly licensed contractor in this state. However, notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 143, the court may determine that there has been substantial compliance
 with licensure requirements under this section if it is shown at an evidentiary hearing that the person who engaged in the business or acted in the capacity of a contractor (1) had been duly licensed as a contractor in this state prior to the performance of the act or contract, (2) acted reasonably and in good faith to maintain proper licensure, and (3) acted promptly and in good faith to remedy the failure to comply with the licensure requirements upon learning of the failure.

(f) The exceptions to the prohibition against the application of the judicial doctrine of substantial compliance found in subdivision (e) shall apply to all contracts entered into on or after January 1, 1992, and to all actions or arbitrations arising therefrom, except that the amendments to subdivisions (e) and (f) enacted during the 1994 portion of the 1993–94
 Regular Session of the Legislature shall not apply to either of the following:

(1) Any legal action or arbitration commenced prior to January 1, 1995, regardless of the date on which the parties entered into the contract.

(2) Any legal action or arbitration commenced on or after January 1, 1995, if the legal action or arbitration was commenced prior to January 1, 1995, and was subsequently dismissed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 312, Sec. 56.   (SB 1474)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

7031.5.

Each county or city which requires the issuance of a permit as a condition precedent to the construction, alteration, improvement, demolition or repair of any building or structure shall also require that each applicant for such a permit file as a condition precedent to the issuance of a permit a statement which he has prepared and signed stating that the applicant is licensed under the provisions of this chapter, giving the number of the license and stating that it is in full force and effect, or, if the applicant is exempt from the provisions of this chapter, the basis for the alleged exemption.

Any violation of this section by any applicant for a permit shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1052.)
-------------------------------------------

7032.

Nothing in this chapter shall limit the power of a city or county to regulate the quality and character of installations made by contractors through a system of permits and inspections which are designed to secure compliance with and aid in the enforcement of applicable state and local building laws, or to enforce other local laws necessary for the protection of the public health and safety. Nothing in this chapter shall limit the power of a city or county to adopt any system of permits requiring submission to and approval by the city or county of plans and specifications for an installation prior to the commencement of construction of the installation.

Cities or counties may direct complaints to the registrar against licensees based upon determinations by city or county enforcement officers of violations by such licensees of codes the enforcement of which is the responsibility of the complaining city or county. Such complaints shall to the extent determined to be necessary by the registrar be given priority in processing over other complaints.

Nothing contained in this section shall be construed as authorizing a city or county to enact regulations relating to the qualifications necessary to engage in the business of contracting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 198.)
-------------------------------------------

7033.

Every city or city and county which requires the issuance of a business license as a condition precedent to engaging, within the city or city and county, in a business which is subject to regulation under this chapter, shall require that each licensee and each applicant for issuance or renewal of such license shall file, or have on file, with such city or city and county, a signed statement that such licensee or applicant is licensed under the provisions of this chapter and stating that the license is in full force and effect, or, if such licensee or applicant is exempt from the provisions of this chapter, he shall furnish proof of the facts which entitle him to such exemption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1082.)
-------------------------------------------

7034.

(a) No contractor that is required to be licensed under this chapter shall insert in any contract, or be a party, with a subcontractor that is licensed under this chapter to any contract which contains a provision, clause, covenant, or agreement which is void or unenforceable under Section 2782 of the Civil Code.

(b) No contractor that is required to be licensed under this chapter shall require a waiver of lien rights from any subcontractor, employee, or supplier in violation of Section 8122 of the Civil Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 1.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------

7035.

(a) A specialty contractor shall not enter into a contract for the performance of work on the same single project or undertaking with more than one subcontractor in the same license classification as the specialty contractor offering the contract, unless either of the following requirements are satisfied:

(1) The subcontractor employs persons who are classified as employees to perform work in that license classification on the single project or undertaking.

(2) The specialty contractor is a signatory to a bona fide collective bargaining agreement that covers the type of work being performed on the single project or undertaking and addresses the issue of subcontracting or
 subletting.

(b) A violation of subdivision (a) shall constitute a cause for disciplinary action.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Employs persons who are classified as employees” means the subcontractor classifies the individuals as employees rather than as independent contractors for purposes of the Labor Code.

(2) “Specialty contractor” has the same meaning as in Section 7058.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 568, Sec. 1.   (AB 1204)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

7036.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the Attorney General may bring a civil action to impose discipline upon, to deny an application for, or to deny continued maintenance of, a contractor’s license. The civil action shall be brought on the grounds that a person has failed to pay its workers the full amount of wages that the workers are entitled to under state law, has not fulfilled a wage judgment, or is in violation of an injunction or court order regarding the payment of wages to its workers.

(b) The Attorney General shall notify the registrar at least 30 days prior to filing a civil complaint pursuant to subdivision (a). The Attorney General’s failure to provide this notice shall not constitute a defense to the action.

(c) The board may intervene in any court proceedings brought pursuant to this section within 60 days of the filing of the initial complaint. After that time, intervention shall be by leave of court upon good cause shown. If the board elects not to intervene, the election shall be deemed consent by the board to comply with any order of the court issued pursuant to subdivision (d) and to be subject to the court’s jurisdiction to enforce the order, if necessary. No action or inaction under this section shall preclude the registrar from independently or concurrently proceeding administratively against the contractor’s license and obtaining administrative remedies for any violations not alleged in the Attorney General’s complaint, whether or not the board has intervened.

(d) Upon the Attorney General establishing the cause of action described in subdivision (a), the following shall
 apply:

(1) The relief granted shall be in the form of an order by the court directing the registrar to exercise its authority to suspend or revoke, to deny an application for, or to deny the continued maintenance of, a contractor’s license under terms specified by the court. In granting the relief, the court may consider both the severity and the form of relief imposed by the registrar in disciplinary actions taken by the registrar, making reasonable efforts to conform to the court’s order.

(2) Any order for suspension, revocation, or application denial pursuant to this section shall be considered disciplinary action within the meaning of Section 7071.8 and legal action within the meaning of Section 7124.6, and, unless the court orders otherwise, the registrar shall determine the length of time prior to license reinstatement or reissuance pursuant to Section 7102, except that a
 license denied under this section is subject to the period prescribed in subdivision (a) of Section 486.

(e) Nothing in this section shall preclude or require the board to investigate a license for violations of this chapter pursuant to Sections 7011.7 and 7090 or require the board to afford notice or a hearing under the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(f) A good faith mistake regarding which wage rate applies to a particular category of work, including, but not limited to, for purposes of payment of prevailing wages, shall not constitute a violation under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 567, Sec. 1.   (AB 1002)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Exemptions [7040. - 7054.5.]

7040.

(a) This chapter does not apply to an authorized representative of the United States government, the State of California, any federally recognized tribe or participating tribe acting within tribal jurisdiction, or any incorporated town, city, county, irrigation district, reclamation district, or other municipal or political corporation or subdivision of this state when the entity or its representative is acting within the scope of the entity’s or representative’s official capacity.

(b) Nothing in this section authorizes the entity or its authorized representative thereof either to enter into or authorize a contract with an unlicensed contractor for work that is required by this chapter to be performed by a licensed contractor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 485, Sec. 5.   (SB 1455)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

7041.

This chapter does not apply to officers of a court when they are acting within the scope of their office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 37.)
-------------------------------------------

7042.

This chapter does not apply to public utilities operating under the regulation of the State Railroad Commission on construction, maintenance and development work incidental to their own business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 37.)
-------------------------------------------

7042.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, gas, heat, or electrical corporations and their subsidiaries that are regulated as public utilities by the Public Utilities Commission shall not conduct work for which a contractor’s license is required, except under any one or more of the following conditions:

(1) The work is performed upon the gas, heat, or electrical corporation’s properties.

(2) The work is performed through a contract with a contractor or contractors licensed pursuant to this chapter or the work is performed for low-income citizens pursuant to a program authorized by order of the Public Utilities Commission. 

(3) The work is undertaken by the gas, heat, or electrical corporation in furtherance of the generation, transmission, or distribution of electricity, gas, or steam, whether within or without the service area of the corporation, if any work performed within a structure and beyond a customer’s utility meter is necessary to protect the public safety or to avoid interruption of service.

(4) The work is otherwise exempt from the provisions of this chapter.

(5) The work is performed to comply with programs or procedures ordered or authorized by the Public Utilities Commission not inconsistent with the objectives expressed in Chapter 984 of the Statutes of 1983.

(b) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Gas, heat, or electrical corporation properties” means properties which a gas, heat, or electrical corporation owns or leases, or over which it has been granted an easement for utility purposes, or facilities which a gas, heat, or electrical corporation owns or operates for utility purposes.

(2) “Subsidiaries” means subsidiaries of a gas, heat, or electrical corporation regulated as public utilities by the Public Utilities Commission which carry out activities solely for utility purposes.

(c) It is the intention of the Legislature in enacting this section that public utility regulations be clearly based on the principle that the energy conservation industry should be allowed to develop in a competitive manner, as declared in Chapter 984 of the Statutes of 1983.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 29, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7042.5.

This chapter does not apply to public utilities operating under the regulation of the Public Utilities Commission on construction, maintenance, and development work incidental to their own business, or to those activities of a cable television corporation subject to regulation pursuant to Section 768.5 of the Public Utilities Code, except underground trenching by a cable television corporation within the public streets, other than that necessary solely for the connection of its distribution system to, or within the properties of, subscribers or potential subscribers.

As used in this section, a cable television corporation is a corporation or person that transmits television programs by cable to subscribers for a fee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 945, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7043.

This chapter does not apply to any construction, repair or operation incidental to the discovering or producing of petroleum or gas, or the drilling, testing, abandoning or other operation of any petroleum or gas well, when performed by an owner or lessee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 37.)
-------------------------------------------

7044.

(a) This chapter does not apply to any of the following:

(1) An owner who builds or improves a structure on his or her property, provided that both of the following conditions are met:

(A) None of the improvements are intended or offered for sale.

(B) The property owner personally performs all of the work or any work not performed by the owner is performed by the owner’s employees with wages as their sole compensation.

(2) An owner who builds or improves a structure on his or her property, provided that both of the
 following conditions are met:

(A) The owner directly contracts with licensees who are duly licensed to contract for the work of the respective trades involved in completing the project.

(B) For projects involving single-family residential structures, no more than four of these structures are intended or offered for sale in a calendar year. This subparagraph shall not apply if the owner contracts with a general contractor for the construction.

(3) A homeowner improving his or her principal place of residence or appurtenances thereto, provided that all of the following conditions exist:

(A) The work is performed prior to sale.
